Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 2
N

ORTH GEORGIA MOUNTAINS AUTHORITY

12-3-290. Creation of authority as constituting instrumentality of state and public corporation; delegation of powers and duties; duration of authority's existence.

There is created a body corporate and politic to be known as the North Georgia Mountains Authority, which shall be deemed an instrumentality of the State of Georgia and a public corporation, and by that name, style, and title such body may contract and be contracted with, sue and be sued, implead and be impleaded, and complain and defend in all courts.

The authority may delegate to one or more of its members, or to its agents and employees, such powers and duties as it may deem proper.

The authority shall exist for 99 years.

The authority is assigned to the Department of Natural Resources for administrative purposes only.

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 297, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1522.)

Cross references.

- Effect of assignment for administrative purposes,

§

50-4-3

.

12-3-291. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Authority" means the North Georgia Mountains Authority created by this part.

"Cost of project" means the cost of acquisition of properties or the use thereof, both real and personal, and the cost of construction, remodeling, erection, establishment, maintenance, repair, and equipping of classrooms, laboratories, housing, accommodations, tourist and recreational facilities, experimental facilities, and other facilities necessary to the operation and maintenance of the Georgia Recreation Experiment Station, and the cost of financing charges, interest incurred on construction and one year after completion of construction, as well as the cost of engineering, architectural, administrative, fiscal, and legal expenses and services as well as the cost of plans and specifications, as well as expenses incurred for feasibility or practicability studies.

(2.1) "Master plan" means that document to be created under the auspices of and adopted by the authority of one of its projects and as that master plan may be amended from time to time pursuant to Code Section 12-3-294.1.

"Project" means the acquisition, construction, equipping, maintaining, operating, managing, and promotion of recreation and accommodation and tourist facilities and services, including, but not limited to, recreation centers, outdoor recreation experiment stations, playgrounds, parks, swimming and wading pools, lakes, golf courses, tennis courts, athletic fields and courts, club houses, gymnasiums, museums, convention halls, pageants, auditoriums, stables, restaurants, hotels, motels, hunting and fishing preserves, historic sites and attractions, and any other facilities or services that the authority may desire to undertake, including the related buildings and the usual and convenient facilities appertaining to any undertakings and any extensions or improvements of any facilities, and the acquisition of necessary property therefor, all as may be related to the development of recreational and tourist accommodations and facilities as the authority may deem necessary, convenient, or desirable. The term also means the acquisition, construction, equipping, and maintenance of housing accommodations, classrooms, laboratories, experimental facilities, and other facilities to be utilized in the establishment, operation, and maintenance of the Georgia Recreation Experiment Station, which shall be located in White County, Georgia, and which shall have as its principal purposes experimentation and research in the recreational uses and the preservation of the natural resources of the state, and which shall also develop and implement programs of instruction as to such uses and preservation for the public, for persons employed in the management of public parks or recreation areas and for persons employed in or seeking employment in the outdoor recreation-tourist industry.

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 297, § 2; Ga. L. 1969, p. 828, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 14.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, "plan" was substituted for "Plan" near the beginning of paragraph (2.1).

12-3-292. Membership of authority; officers; bylaws; quorum; action by majority vote; vacancies; reimbursement for expenses; compensation of employees.

The authority shall consist of nine members who shall serve terms of four years from the date of their appointment and shall be appointed by the Governor from the same persons who comprise the Board of Natural Resources.

The Governor shall appoint the chairperson of the authority for a term of one year from among the members of the authority. A member may serve no more than two consecutive terms as chairperson nor more than two terms as chairperson in any one four-year term as a member of the authority. The authority shall elect one of its members as vice chairperson. It shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer who need not be members. The office of secretary and treasurer may be combined in one person.

The authority may make such bylaws for its government as is deemed necessary but is under no duty to do so.

Any five members of the authority shall constitute a quorum necessary for the transaction of business; and a majority vote of those present at any meeting at which there is a quorum shall be sufficient to do and perform any action permitted by this part. No vacancy on the authority shall impair the right of a quorum to transact any and all business as aforesaid.

The unexpired term of any member who ceases to serve from any cause shall be filled in the same manner that such member was originally appointed to the authority.

The members shall receive no compensation for their services, but all members shall be entitled to be reimbursed for actual expenses, including travel and any other expenses, incurred while in the performance of their duties. Employees of the authority shall receive reasonable compensation, to be determined by the members of the authority, for their services.

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 297, § 3; Ga. L. 1973, p. 319, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1683, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 15.)

Cross references.

- Legal mileage allowance,

§

50-19-7

.

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, in subsection (b), "four-year" was hyphenated in the second sentence and a hyphen was removed from "vice chairperson" in the third sentence.

12-3-293. Accountability of members as trustees; maintenance of financial records and books; submitting records, books, and statement of financial position to state auditor.

The members of the authority shall be accountable in all respects as trustees. The authority shall keep suitable and proper books and records of all receipts, income, and expenditures of every kind and shall submit for inspection all of the books together with the proper statement of the authority's financial position at the close of its fiscal year each year to the state auditor. The books and records shall be inspected and audited by the state auditor at least once in each year.

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 297, § 4; Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 16.)

12-3-294. Powers of authority generally.

The authority shall have power:

To have a seal and alter it at pleasure;

To acquire real and personal property of every kind and character by purchase or otherwise and to hold such property; to mortgage, hypothecate, or otherwise encumber its real and personal property for its corporate purposes; to grant a security interest by deed, financing statement, or bill of sale; and to construct a project on lands held by the state;

To exercise the power of eminent domain;

To appoint and select officers, agents, and employees, including engineering, architectural, and construction experts, and to fix their compensation;

To make contracts, and to execute all instruments necessary or convenient, including contracts to borrow money; contracts for mortgages, security deeds, or other security interests; contracts for the construction of projects; and contracts with respect to the leasing or use of projects which it caused to be subdivided, erected, or acquired or which it constructs or manages pursuant to an agreement with the state;

To plan, survey, subdivide, improve, administer, construct, erect, acquire, own, repair, remodel, maintain, add to, extend, improve, equip, operate, and manage projects as defined in Code Section 12-3-291, to be located on property owned or leased by the authority or the state. The cost of any such project may be paid in whole or in part from funds of or available to the authority including but not limited to borrowed money, income, the proceeds of revenue bonds of the authority, and any grant from the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof or from the State of Georgia; provided, however, that the authority shall not undertake any such activity having a projected cost of over $1 million unless it has first evaluated the feasibility of involving private persons or entities in the development, construction, operation, and management of the authority's existing projects and such proposed activities and has filed a copy of such evaluation with the Office of Planning and Budget and the Recreational Authorities Overview Committee;

To accept loans and grants, either or both, of money or materials or property of any kind from the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, upon such terms and conditions as the United States or such agency or instrumentality may impose;

To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes, to issue negotiable revenue bonds from earnings of projects, and to provide for the payment of the same and for the rights of the holders thereof;

To exercise any power usually possessed by private corporations performing similar functions, which is not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of this state;

To act as agent for the United States, or any agency, department, corporation, or instrumentality thereof, in any manner within the purposes or powers of the authority;

To adopt, alter, or repeal its own bylaws, rules, and regulations governing the manner in which its business may be transacted and in which the power granted to it may be enjoyed as the authority may deem necessary or expedient in facilitating its business;

To do any and all other acts and things in this part authorized or required to be done, whether or not included in the general powers mentioned in this Code section;

To receive gifts, donations, or contributions from any person, firm, or corporation;

To hold, use, administer, and expend such sum or sums as may hereafter be received from any source, including income or gifts, for any of the purposes of this authority;

(14.1) To do any other things necessary or proper to foster and promote the involvement of private persons, firms, corporations, and partnerships in the development, construction, operation, and management of the authority's projects or projects which it manages pursuant to an agreement with the state, including but not limited to the entering into of contracts with such private entities for the development, construction, operation, and management of said projects for and on behalf of the authority;

To do any other things necessary or proper to beautify, improve, and render projects self-supporting, including the establishment and modification of all reasonable fees, rentals, and other charges of whatever kind it deems necessary;

To construct, maintain, and operate a project in White County, Georgia, to be known and designated as the "Georgia Recreation Experiment Station." In connection with such project, the Governor is authorized to execute for and on behalf of the state a lease upon any and all lands owned and held by the state in such county to the authority for a period not to exceed 50 years, such land so leased to be used by the authority only in connection with such project;

To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this part; and

Upon obtaining a license from the Department of Revenue, to sell or dispense or to permit others to sell or dispense alcoholic beverages within or upon property or facilities owned, operated, managed, used, or controlled by the authority for consumption on the premises; provided, however, that the authority shall not sell or dispense alcoholic beverages in unbroken containers to be carried off of the premises. The sales authorized by this paragraph shall be limited to hotels, motels, lodges, and convention halls and those auditoriums, club houses, meeting rooms, and restaurants related thereto. The authority shall determine and regulate by resolution, as it may amend from time to time, the conditions under which such sales or dispensing of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises shall be made or shall be permitted. The authority shall give at least 30 days' public notice by publication in the county organ of the county in which the property or facility is located of its intent to adopt such a resolution or to amend a previously adopted resolution. The authority shall hold a public hearing at a convenient time and location in such county at least 15 days prior to adopting such a resolution to hear public comments. Any such resolution or amendment to a previously adopted resolution shall be adopted only at an open and public meeting of the authority after the required public notice has been given and the required public hearing has been held.

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 369, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 297, § 5; Ga. L. 1973, p. 319, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1683, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1781, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 17.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, in paragraph (6), "$1 million" was substituted for "$1,000,000.00" and a semicolon was substituted for a period at the end.

12-3-294.1. Master plan; creations; contents; notice and hearing on preliminary plan; adherence to plan; amendment.

The authority shall, on or before July 1, 1996, cause to be created a master plan for the management, preservation, protection, and development of each of its projects as defined in Code Section 12-3-291. The master plans for adjacent or contiguous projects may be combined into one document. The master plan for a project shall delineate, based upon aerial or other appropriate means of survey, the present and presently anticipated future uses of the land area of each project and shall also designate areas to be managed as environmentally sensitive, historically sensitive, and active use areas.

In the creation of a master plan for a project, the authority shall, after preparation of a preliminary plan, give notice of the existence of the preliminary plan in the legal organ of the county in which the project is located and in at least two newspapers of state-wide general circulation not less than 60 days prior to the meeting of the authority at which the preliminary plan is to be considered for final adoption. After giving this notice, the authority shall hold a public hearing at a convenient location and receive and consider such oral and written comments on the preliminary plan as may be presented.

The authority, in the exercise of its authority to develop, manage, preserve, and protect its projects, shall be guided by and shall adhere to the master plan for a project, as the same may from time to time be amended as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section.

The authority may from time to time amend the master plan for a project, but only in compliance with the following procedure:

Any proposed amendment to a master plan shall be described in written form and, if capable of such description, in visual form and presented publicly at a regular meeting of the authority;

After the proposed amendment is presented publicly at a regular meeting of the authority, a brief summary of the proposed amendment shall be advertised in the legal organ of the county where the project is located, distributed to the media by news release, and published in appropriate publications of the authority. Each such advertisement, news release, and publication shall also contain:

The time and place of the public hearing on the proposed amendment, which public hearing shall be held no earlier than 15 days after the latest publication of the advertisement in the legal organ as required by this paragraph;

Directions as to the manner of receiving comments from the public regarding the proposed amendment; and

The date on which the meeting of the authority at which the proposed amendment will be considered for approval or rejection, which meeting shall not be held any sooner than 30 days after the meeting of the authority at which the proposed change was announced pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection;

The authority shall transmit three copies of the information required by paragraph (2) of this subsection to the Office of Legislative Counsel at least 30 days prior to the date of the meeting at which the proposed amendment will be considered. The Office of Legislative Counsel shall immediately furnish the presiding officers of each house of the General Assembly with a copy of the information received. The presiding officers, or the Office of Legislative Counsel if a presiding officer is unavailable, shall then assign the information to the chairperson of the appropriate standing committee in each house for review and provide copies to any member of that house who makes, or has made, a written request;

In the event a standing committee to which the information has been assigned as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection files an objection to a proposed amendment to the master plan with the chairperson of the authority prior to the authority's taking action on the proposed amendment and the authority adopts the proposed amendment over the objection, the authority shall notify the presiding officers of the Senate and House of Representatives, the chairpersons of the standing committees to which the information was referred, and the Office of Legislative Counsel within ten days after the adoption of the amendment to the master plan. Thereafter, by introduction of a resolution to override the amendment within the first 30 days of the next regular session of the General Assembly, the amendment may be considered by the branch of the General Assembly whose committee objected to its adoption. In the event the resolution is adopted by the members of the branch of the General Assembly in which it is introduced, it shall be immediately transferred to the other branch of the General Assembly, which branch shall consider the resolution within five days of its being received. In the event the resolution to override the amendment to the master plan is adopted by a vote of two-thirds of the members of each branch, the amendment to the master plan shall be void on the day after the adoption of the resolution by the second branch of the General Assembly. In the event the resolution is ratified by a vote of less than two-thirds of the members of either house, the resolution shall be submitted to the Governor for approval or veto. In the event the resolution fails to pass both houses or is vetoed by the Governor, the amendment to the master plan shall remain in effect. In the event of the Governor's approval of the resolution, the amendment to the master plan shall be void on the day after the date of the Governor's approval of the resolution;

Any proposed changes to the boundaries of any area or areas delineated on a master plan as a part of an area designated to be managed as environmentally or historically sensitive shall, at least seven days prior to the public hearing required by paragraph (2) of this subsection, be surveyed and marked in such a fashion as to be readily discernible on the ground by members of the public; and

At the meeting of the authority which has been identified in the advertisement required by paragraph (2) of this subsection as the meeting to consider the approval or rejection of the proposed amendment, the authority shall consider in an open and public meeting the proposed amendment to the master plan, which, if approved, shall become a part of the master plan for that project, subject, however, to the provisions of paragraph (4) of this subsection.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-294.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 18.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, "authority" was substituted for "Authority" twice in the first sentence of subsection (b) and, in subsection (d), near the beginning of paragraph (d)(2) and near the beginning of paragraph (d)(6); in subsection (c), "develop" was substituted for "development" and a comma was added after "preserve"; and, in subsection (d), "the" was deleted preceding "Legislative Counsel" in the last sentence of paragraph (d)(3) and near the end of the first sentence of paragraph (d)(4).

12-3-295. Security officers.

The North Georgia Mountains Authority is authorized to appoint security officers to safeguard the property of the authority and the safety of the general public. The duly appointed security officers of the authority are authorized, while on the premises over which the authority exercises dominion and control, to carry weapons, to make arrests, and to exercise such of the police power of the state as may be necessary to maintain peace and order and to enforce any and all lawful zoning, user, and personal conduct regulations.

(Ga. L. 1971, p. 315, § 1.)

12-3-296. Provision of legal services by Attorney General.

The Attorney General shall provide legal services for the authority, and in connection therewith Code Sections 45-15-13 through 45-15-16 shall be fully applicable.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 319, § 3.)

12-3-297. Lease of state lands to authority.

The Governor is authorized to execute for and on behalf of the state a lease of lands owned by the state, or any part or parcel thereof, to the authority for a period not to exceed 50 years.

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 369, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 297, § 6; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1683, § 4.)

Cross references.

- Revenue bonds generally,

§

36-82-60

et seq.

12-3-298. Revenue bonds - Issuance for purpose of paying for cost of projects.

The authority shall have the power and is authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of negotiable revenue bonds for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost, as defined in Code Section 12-3-291, of any one project or a combination of projects. The principal and interest of such revenue bonds shall be payable solely from a special fund provided for in this Code section. The bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall bear interest at the lowest attainable rate, payable in such medium of payment as to both principal and interest as may be determined by the authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the authority, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the authority in the resolution in providing for the issuance of the bonds.

The authority shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or the denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest thereof, which may be at any bank or trust company within or outside the state. The bonds may be issued in coupon or registered form, or both, as the authority may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bond as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest.

All bonds shall be signed by the chairman of the authority, and the official seal of the authority shall be affixed thereto and attested by the secretary of the authority, and any coupons attached thereto shall bear the signature or facsimile signature of the chairman of the authority. In case any officer whose signature shall appear on any bonds or whose facsimile signature shall appear on any coupon shall cease to be an officer before delivery of such bonds, such signature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery.

Such bonds and the income thereof shall be exempt from taxation in the State of Georgia.

The authority may sell such bonds in such manner and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the authority.

Any resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds under this part shall become effective immediately upon its passage and need not be published or posted, and any such resolution may be passed at any regular or special or adjourned meeting of the authority by a majority of its members.

Revenue bonds issued under this part shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the State of Georgia or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state, but such bonds shall be payable solely from the fund provided for in this Code section. The issuance of such revenue bonds shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the state to levy or to pledge any form of taxation whatever therefor or to make any appropriation for the payment thereof. All such bonds shall contain recitals on their faces covering substantially the foregoing provisions of this subsection.

In the discretion of the authority, any issue of revenue bonds may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or outside the state. Such trust indenture may pledge or assign rents, revenues, and earnings to be received by the authority. Either the resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds or the trust indenture itself may contain such provisions for perfecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the acquisition of property; the construction of the project; the maintenance, operation, repair, and insurance of the project or projects; and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys and revenues. The resolution or trust indenture may also provide that any project shall be constructed and paid for under the supervision and approval of consulting engineers or architects employed or designated by the authority and satisfactory to the original purchasers of the bonds issued therefor. Such indenture may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee and may restrict the individual right of action of bondholders as is customary in trust indentures securing bonds and debentures of corporations. In addition to the foregoing, such trust indenture may contain such other provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders.

All revenues, rents, and earnings derived from any project or projects and all funds from any source whatsoever received by the authority may be pledged and allocated by the authority to the payment of principal and interest on revenue bonds of the authority as the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the trust instrument may provide; and such funds so pledged from whatever source received shall be set aside at regular intervals as may be provided in the resolution or trust indenture into a sinking fund which shall be pledged to and charged with the payment of:

Interest upon such revenue bonds as such interest shall fall due;

The principal of the bonds as the same shall fall due;

The necessary charges of paying agents for paying principal and interest; and

Any premium upon bonds retired by call or purchase.

The use and disposition of such sinking fund shall be subject to such regulations as may be provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds or in the trust indenture, but, except as may otherwise be provided in such resolution or trust indenture, such sinking fund shall be affirmed for the benefit of all revenue bonds without distinction or priority of one over the other.

Any holder of revenue bonds issued under this part or any of the coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under the trust indenture, if any, except to the extent the rights given by this Code section may be restricted by resolution passed before the issuance of the bonds or by the trust indenture, may, either at law or in equity, by action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the State of Georgia which are granted by this part or by such resolution or trust indenture and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this part or by such resolution or trust indenture, to be performed by the authority, or any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collection of revenues, rents, and other charges for the use of the project or projects. No holder of such bonds shall have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of the state to pay any such bond or the interest thereon, or to enforce the payment thereof against the property of the state, nor shall any such bond constitute a charge, lien, or encumbrance, legal or equitable, upon any property of the state.

It is found, determined, and declared that the creation of the authority and the carrying out of its purposes as defined in this part are in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state and are public purposes, and that the authority will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the powers conferred upon it by this part. The state covenants with the holders of the bonds that the authority shall be required to pay no taxes or assessments upon any of the property acquired or leased by it, or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision, or upon its activities in the operation or maintenance of the buildings and facilities erected or acquired by it, or any fees, rentals, or other charges, for the use of such buildings, or any other income received by the authority. Further, the state covenants that the bonds of the authority, their transfer, and the income therefrom shall at all times be exempt from taxation within this state. Any exemption from taxation provided by this subsection shall not include exemption from sales and use taxes.

Any action to protect or enforce any rights under this part shall be brought in the Superior Court of Fulton County, Georgia, and any action pertaining to validation of any bonds issued under this part shall likewise be brought in such court, which shall have exclusive, original jurisdiction of such actions.

Bonds of the authority shall be confirmed and validated in accordance with the procedure of Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36. The petition for validation shall also make party defendant to such action any authority, subdivision, instrumentality, or agency of the State of Georgia which has contracted with the authority for the use of any building or facility for which bonds have been issued and sought to be validated; and such authority, subdivision, instrumentality, or agency shall be required to show cause, if any, why such contract or contracts and the terms and conditions thereof should not be inquired into by the court, the validity of the terms thereof determined, and the contract adjudicated as security for the payment of any such bonds of the authority. The bonds, when validated, and the judgment of validation shall be final and conclusive with respect to such bonds and against the authority issuing the same and against any authority, subdivision, instrumentality, department, or agency contracting with the authority.

The authority shall prescribe the rules and regulations for the operation of all projects, and it shall be the duty of the authority to fix rentals and other charges for the use of such projects so as to provide a fund sufficient with other revenues, if any, to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating the projects and to pay the principal of the revenue bonds and the interest thereon as the same shall become due.

The offer, sale, or issuance of bonds, notes, or obligations by the authority shall not be subject to the provisions of Chapter 5 of Title 10, the "Georgia Uniform Securities Act of 2008."

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 369, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 297, § 6B; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 12; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1683, § 5; Ga. L. 2008, p. 381, § 10/SB 358.)

12-3-299. Jurisdiction of authority.

The North Georgia Mountains Authority shall exercise all of its powers and engage in the business of its projects within the territorial boundaries and jurisdiction of Banks, Catoosa, Chattooga, Cherokee, Dade, Dawson, Fannin, Forsyth, Franklin, Gilmer, Gwinnett, Habersham, Hall, Lumpkin, Murray, Pickens, Rabun, Stephens, Towns, Union, Walker, White, and Whitfield counties and such other counties as may from time to time be admitted by resolution of the authority.

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 297, § 7.)

12-3-300. Approval of indebtedness by Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission.

Any other provision of this part to the contrary notwithstanding, the authority shall not incur any debt of any kind, whether through contract, mortgage, or otherwise, or encumber any real or personal property in any manner unless such action has been approved in advance, in writing, by the Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission as defined by Article VII, Section IV, Paragraph VII of the Constitution and Article 2 of Chapter 17 of Title 50, the "Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-3-300

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1683, § 6.)